Washington statutes.
RCW 15.100.160

Superior courts—Jurisdiction.

The superior courts are hereby vested with jurisdiction to enforce this chapter and the rules of the commission, and to prevent and restrain violations thereof.

[ 2001 c 314 s 16.]